Utah statutes.
63A-11-106.   Annual report -- Budget.

(1)  On or before the 1st day of October each year, the executive director shall report to the governor and the Child Welfare Legislative Oversight Panel of the Legislature regarding the preceding fiscal year on the operations, activities, and goals of the program.

(2)  The executive director shall prepare a budget of:

(a)  the administrative expenses for the program; and

(b)  the amount estimated to fund needed contracts and other costs.



Amended by Chapter 265, 2011 General Session

